Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202668-2203
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Medicaid Access and Quality Act:

(1) Nonhospital provider means a provider of physical health services that does not hold a license as a hospital under the Health Care Facility Licensure Act;

(2) Physical health services means services billed under the medicaid practitioner fee schedule to meet the physical health needs of a patient; and

(3) Rural means any county in Nebraska having a population of less than one hundred thousand residents.

Laws 2025, LB527, § 3.

Health Care Facility Licensure Act, see section 71-401.